Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1034.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6304(f)(2)(i) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6304. Exclusions from child abuse.* * *(f) Child-on-child contact.--* * *(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the following shall apply:(i) Acts constituting any of the following crimes against a child shall be subject to the reporting requirements of this chapter:(A) rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape);123456789101112131415161718 (B) involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse);(C) sexual assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault);(D) aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault);(E) indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3126 (relating to indecent assault); [and](F) indecent exposure as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3127 (relating to indecent exposure)[.];(G) unlawful dissemination of intimate image as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3131 (relating to unlawful dissemination of intimate image); and(H) sexual abuse of children as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1034PN1199 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920